Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [216B.1697] INSTANT SOLAR PERMITTING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Applicable permitting authority" means a unit of local government in Minnesota with more than 5,000 residents that reviews and issues permits to install residential photovoltaic systems within the unit of local government's jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (c) "Manual review" means the review of a permit application and associated documents or review of a prerequisite application or associated documents, the approval of which is conditional for receiving a permit, for a residential photovoltaic system by an individual who is a representative of a permitting authority. new text end new text begin (d) "Residential instant solar permitting platform" means software or a combination of software that automates plan review, automatically produces code-compliant approvals, accepts online payments for permitting fees if permitting fees are levied, and instantly issues permits and permit revisions for residential photovoltaic system permit applications submitted to the applicable permitting authority upon the online submission of permitting fee payments, if permitting fees are levied, and a code compliant application. The residential instant solar permitting platform must be available for photovoltaic systems up to the maximum capacity allowed with a 200-amp main service disconnect that provides electrical power to a one- or two-family dwelling, and that may include an energy storage system, a main panel upgrade, or a main breaker derate. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Residential instant solar permitting platforms. new text end new text begin (a) An applicable permitting authority must adopt a residential instant solar permitting platform. The applicable permitting authority must anticipate that the residential instant solar permitting platform has the capability to process at least 75 percent of the residential photovoltaic permit applications submitted on existing construction in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding other laws or rules, an applicable permitting authority must not require manual review for a photovoltaic system approved by the residential instant solar permitting platform at any time during the permitting and inspection processes. new text end new text begin (c) Paragraph (b) does not preclude an inspector from examining a construction document. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Compliance report. new text end new text begin (a) An applicable permitting authority must submit a compliance report to the department when the applicable permitting authority is in compliance with subdivision 2. The report must be submitted within 60 days of the date that the applicable permitting authority is first compliant with subdivision 2. The department may set guidelines for reports submitted under this subdivision. The report must include the following: new text end new text begin (1) the date of compliance; new text end new text begin (2) the software used for compliance; new text end new text begin (3) confirmation that the applicable permitting authority is: new text end new text begin (i) using a residential instant solar permitting platform to instantly issue permits and permit revisions for residential photovoltaic systems; and new text end new text begin (ii) not requiring manual review at any time during the permitting and inspection process; and new text end new text begin (4) an explanation describing why the applicable permitting authority anticipates the residential instant solar permitting platform has the capability to process at least 75 percent of the residential photovoltaic permit applications submitted on existing construction in Minnesota. An applicable permitting authority may provide an explanation that is based on a statement from the provider of the residential instant solar permitting platform and other information that supports a finding that a residential instant solar permitting platform has the capability to process at least 75 percent of the residential photovoltaic permit applications. new text end new text begin (b) The department may determine if the applicable permitting authority's compliance report submitted under paragraph (a) is accurate, make the findings publicly available, and take action to encourage and enforce compliance with subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Annual report. new text end new text begin (a) An applicable permitting authority must submit an annual report to the department regarding use of the residential instant solar permitting platform. Beginning April 1, 2027, an applicable permitting authority must annually report to the department by April 1 each year until April 1, 2036. The report must cover the previous calendar year and must include: new text end new text begin (1) the number of permits issued through the residential instant solar permitting platform and the relevant characteristics of the permitted systems; new text end new text begin (2) the number of residential photovoltaic permits issued by means other than the residential instant solar permitting platform and the relevant characteristics of the alternatively permitted systems; new text end new text begin (3) the software used for compliance; new text end new text begin (4) confirmation that the applicable permitting authority is: new text end new text begin (i) using a residential instant solar permitting platform to instantly issue permits and permit revisions for residential photovoltaic systems; and new text end new text begin (ii) not requiring manual review at any time during the permitting and inspection process; and new text end new text begin (5) a plan to increase use of the residential instant solar permitting platform if fewer than 75 percent of the residential photovoltaic permits for existing construction are issued through the residential instant solar permitting platform. new text end new text begin (b) The department may determine if the applicable permitting authority's annual report submitted under paragraph (a) is accurate, make the findings publicly available, and take action at the department's discretion to encourage and enforce compliance with subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Self-certification. new text end new text begin An applicable permitting authority must self-certify the applicable permitting authority's compliance with this section when applying for funding from the department after the applicable date in subdivision 2. An applicable permitting authority that fails to comply with this section may be ineligible for funding opportunities offered by the department. The department may condition or deny an applicable permitting authority direct funding from a department program if the applicable permitting authority does not comply with this section. This subdivision does not apply to the $2,000,000 in funds available pursuant to section 216C.48. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Inspections. new text end new text begin (a) An applicable permitting authority must inspect completed projects permitted by the residential instant solar permitting platform. new text end new text begin (b) An applicable permitting authority must provide an option for a remote inspection via recorded video or photo that may be submitted electronically for projects permitted by the residential instant solar permitting platform. An inspection under this paragraph must not cost more than or result in greater delay than an in-person inspection. new text end new text begin (c) An applicable permitting authority must not require more than one inspection for a project permitted by the residential instant solar permitting platform unless the first inspection was failed. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin An applicable permitting authority that does not require a permit for residential photovoltaic solar systems is exempt from this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end